Maryland, session 2025, HB0519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–308.12.
(A) (1) EACH HOSPITAL IN THE STATE SHALL PROVIDE PARKING AT NO
COST TO:
(I) EACH INPATIENT FOR THE DURATION OF THE INPATIENT’S
ADMISSION; AND
(II) EACH OUTPATIENT ATTENDING A SCHEDULED MEDICAL
APPOINTMENT FOR THE DURATION OF THE APPOINTMENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0519*

HOUSE BILL 519
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO EACH PARKING
FACILITY OWNED, OPERATED, OR LEASED BY THE HOSPITAL AT WHICH THE
INPATIENT OR OUTPATIENT IS RECEIVING SERVICES.
(B) EACH HOSPITAL SHALL DISPLAY SIGNAGE AT EACH PUBLIC ENTRANCE
AND PARKING FACILITY INFORMING INPATIENTS AND OUTPATIENTS OF THE
AVAILABILITY OF PARKING AT NO COST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.